Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 2002, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 214, O.S.L. 2025 (56 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2002), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2002. A. For the purpose of providing quality care


enhancements, the Oklahoma Health Care Authority is authorized to


and shall assess a Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee pursuant


to this section upon each nursing facility licensed in this state.


Facilities operated by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs


shall be exempt from this fee. Quality of care enhancements



Req. No. 2454 Page 1


include, but are not limited to, the purposes specified in this


section.


B. As a basis for determining the Nursing Facilities Quality of


Care Fee assessed upon each licensed nursing facility, the Authority


shall calculate a uniform per-patient day rate. The rate shall be


calculated by dividing six percent (6%) of the total annual patient


gross receipts of all licensed nursing facilities in this state by


the total number of patient days for all licensed nursing facilities


in this state. The result shall be the per-patient day rate.


Beginning July 15, 2004, the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee


shall not be increased unless specifically authorized by the


Legislature.


C. Pursuant to any approved Medicaid waiver and pursuant to


subsection N of this section, the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care


Fee shall not exceed the amount or rate allowed by federal law for


nursing home licensed bed days.


D. The Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee owed by a


licensed nursing facility shall be calculated by the Authority by


adding the daily patient census of a licensed nursing facility, as


reported by the facility for each day of the month, and by


multiplying the ensuing figure by the per-patient day rate


determined pursuant to the provisions of subsection B of this


section.



Req. No. 2454 Page 2


E. Each licensed nursing facility which is assessed the Nursing


Facilities Quality of Care Fee shall be required to file a report on


a monthly basis with the Authority detailing the daily patient


census and patient gross receipts at such time and in such manner as


required by the Authority.


F. 1. The Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee for a


licensed nursing facility for the period beginning October 1, 2000,


shall be determined using the daily patient census and annual


patient gross receipts figures reported to the Authority for the


calendar year 1999 upon forms supplied by the Authority.


2. Annually the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee shall be


determined by:


a. using the daily patient census and patient gross


receipts reports received by the Authority for the


most recent available twelve (12) months, and


b. annualizing those figures.


Each year thereafter, the annualization of the Nursing


Facilities Quality of Care Fee specified in this paragraph shall be


subject to the limitation in subsection B of this section unless the


provision of subsection C of this section is met.


G. The payment of the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee by


licensed nursing facilities shall be an allowable cost for Medicaid


reimbursement purposes.



Req. No. 2454 Page 3


H. 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a


revolving fund to be designated the “Nursing Facility Quality of


Care Fund”.


2. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal


year limitations, and shall consist of:


a. all monies received by the Authority pursuant to this


section and otherwise specified or authorized by law,


b. monies received by the Authority due to federal


financial participation pursuant to Title XIX of the


Social Security Act, and


c. interest attributable to investment of money in the


fund.


3. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and shall be budgeted and expended by the Authority


for:


a. reimbursement of the additional costs paid to


Medicaid-certified nursing facilities for purposes


specified by Sections 1-1925.2 and 5022.2 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. reimbursement of the Medicaid rate increases for


intermediate care facilities for individuals with


intellectual disabilities (ICFs/IID),


c. nonemergency transportation services for Medicaid-


eligible nursing home clients,

Req. No. 2454 Page 4


d. eyeglass and denture services for Medicaid-eligible


nursing home clients,


e. fifteen ombudsmen employed by the Office of the


Attorney General,


f. ten additional nursing facility inspectors employed by


the State Department of Health,


g. pharmacy and other Medicaid services to qualified


Medicare beneficiaries whose incomes are at or below


one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty


level; provided however, pharmacy benefits authorized


for such qualified Medicare beneficiaries shall be


suspended if the federal government subsequently


extends pharmacy benefits to this population,


h. costs incurred by the Authority in the administration


of the provisions of this section and any programs


created pursuant to this section,


i. durable medical equipment and supplies services for


Medicaid-eligible elderly adults, and


j. personal needs allowance increases for residents of


nursing homes and Intermediate Care Facilities for


Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities


intermediate care facilities for individuals with


intellectual disabilities (ICFs/IID) from Thirty



Req. No. 2454 Page 5


Dollars ($30.00) to Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per month


per resident.


4. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants


issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by


law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services for approval and payment.


5. The fund and the programs specified in this section funded


by revenues collected from the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care


Fee pursuant to this section are exempt from budgetary cuts,


reductions, or eliminations.


6. The Medicaid rate increases for intermediate care facilities


for individuals with intellectual disabilities (ICFs/IID) shall not


exceed the net Medicaid rate increase for nursing facilities


including, but not limited to, the Medicaid rate increase for which


Medicaid-certified nursing facilities are eligible due to the


Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee less the portion of that


increase attributable to treating the Nursing Facilities Quality of


Care Fee as an allowable cost.


7. The reimbursement rate for nursing facilities shall be made


in accordance with Oklahoma’s Medicaid reimbursement rate


methodology and the provisions of this section.


8. No nursing facility shall be guaranteed, expressly or


otherwise, that any additional costs reimbursed to the facility will



Req. No. 2454 Page 6


equal or exceed the amount of the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care


Fee paid by the nursing facility.


I. 1. In the event that federal financial participation


pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act is not available to


the Oklahoma state Medicaid program, for purposes of matching


expenditures from the Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund at the


approved federal medical assistance percentage for the applicable


fiscal year, the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee shall be


null and void as of the date of the nonavailability of such federal


funding, through and during any period of nonavailability.


2. In the event of an invalidation of this section by any court


of last resort under circumstances not covered in subsection J of


this section, the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee shall be


null and void as of the effective date of that invalidation.


3. In the event that the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee


is determined to be null and void for any of the reasons enumerated


in this subsection, any Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee


assessed and collected for any periods after such invalidation shall


be returned in full within sixty (60) days by the Authority to the


nursing facility from which it was collected.


J. 1. If any provision of this section or the application


thereof shall be adjudged to be invalid by any court of last resort,


such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the provisions


of the section, but shall be confined in its operation to the

Req. No. 2454 Page 7


provision thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such


judgment was rendered. The applicability of such provision to other


persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.


2. This subsection shall not apply to any judgment that affects


the rate of the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee, its


applicability to all licensed nursing homes in the state, the usage


of the fee for the purposes prescribed in this section, or the


ability of the Authority to obtain full federal participation to


match its expenditures of the proceeds of the fee.


K. The Authority shall promulgate rules for the implementation


and enforcement of the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee


established by this section.


L. The Authority shall provide for administrative penalties in


the event nursing facilities fail to:


1. Submit the Nursing Facilities Quality of Care Fee;


2. Submit the fee in a timely manner;


3. Submit reports as required by this section; or


4. Submit reports timely.


M. As used in this section:


1. “Nursing facility” means any home, establishment or


institution, or any portion thereof, licensed by the State


Department of Health as defined in Section 1-1902 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes and includes the nursing care component of a



Req. No. 2454 Page 8


continuum of care facility as defined in Section 1-890.2 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Medicaid” means the medical assistance program established


in Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act and administered in


this state by the Authority;


3. “Patient gross revenues” receipts” means gross revenues


received in compensation for services provided to residents of


nursing facilities including, but not limited to, client


participation. The term “patient patient gross revenues” receipts


shall not include amounts received by nursing facilities as


charitable contributions; and


4. “Additional costs paid to Medicaid-certified nursing


facilities under Oklahoma’s Medicaid reimbursement methodology”


means both state and federal Medicaid expenditures including, but


not limited to, funds in excess of the aggregate amounts that would


otherwise have been paid to Medicaid-certified nursing facilities


under the Medicaid reimbursement methodology which have been updated


for inflationary, economic, and regulatory trends and which are in


effect immediately prior to the inception of the Nursing Facilities


Quality of Care Fee.


N. 1. As per any approved federal Medicaid waiver Until the


effective date of this act, the assessment rate subject to the


provision of subsection C of this section is to remain the same as



Req. No. 2454 Page 9


those rates that were in effect prior to January 1, 2012, for all


state-licensed continuum of care facilities.


2. Any facilities that made application to the State Department


of Health to become a licensed continuum of care facility no later


than January 1, 2012, shall be assessed at the same rate as those


facilities assessed pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection;


provided, that any facility making the application shall receive the


license on or before September 1, 2012. Any facility that fails to


receive such license from the State Department of Health by


September 1, 2012, shall be assessed at the rate established by


subsection C of this section subsequent to September 1, 2012 that


were licensed by this state on or before September 1, 2012. Upon


the effective date of this act, the assessment rate for those


continuum of care facilities shall be increased to equal the


assessment rate for all other facilities and thereafter the


assessment rate for all facilities shall be uniform.


O. If any provision of this section, or the application


thereof, is determined by any controlling federal agency, or any


court of last resort to prevent the state from obtaining federal


financial participation in the state’s state Medicaid program, such


provision shall be deemed null and void as of the date of the


nonavailability of such federal funding and through and during any


period of nonavailability. All other provisions of the bill shall


remain valid and enforceable.

Req. No. 2454 Page 10


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2454 DC 1/14/2026 9:26:10 PM











































Req. No. 2454 Page 11